Maine, session 132, LD1298.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §7053, first ¶, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. V, §7, is
further amended to read:
To be eligible for a license to practice social work at any level, an applicant must be at
least 18 years of age and must either satisfactorily pass any examination as the board may
prescribe by its rules or qualify through an alternative pathway under section 7054-D. Each
applicant must demonstrate trustworthiness and competence to engage in the practice of
social work in such a manner as to safeguard the interests of the public. Applications for
licensure must be submitted to the board together with the fee as set under section 7056.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 262, §3, is further
amended to read:
1. Licensed clinical social worker. To be qualified as a licensed clinical social
worker, an applicant shall have demonstrated must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
board adherence to the ethics of the social work profession; shall must have either
successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board or have qualified through
an alternative pathway under section 7054-D; and shall must have received either:
A. A master's or doctoral degree in social work or social welfare from an accredited
educational institution in a clinical concentration and:
(1) Shall Must have subsequently completed 2 years of social work experience
with 96 hours of consultation in a clinical setting; or
(2) Shall Must have demonstrated 2 years of full-time clinical social work
experience or its equivalent and have completed the graduate degree prior to
January 1, 1987 and have completed 2 years of subsequent social work experience
with 96 hours of consultation in a private setting; or
B. A master's or doctoral degree in social work in a nonclinical concentration from an
accredited educational institution and:
(1) Shall Must have subsequently completed 4 years of social work experience
with 192 hours of consultation in a clinical setting; or
(2) Shall Must have demonstrated 2 years of full-time clinical social work
experience or its equivalent and have completed the graduate degree prior to
January 1, 1987 and have completed 4 years of subsequent social work experience
with 192 hours of consultation in a private setting.
The board may waive up to one year of the post-master of social work, clinical experience
requirement pursuant to this subsection for those candidates who demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the board equivalent clinical experience prior to receiving the master's
degree in social work.
The board shall issue rules in accordance with Title 5, chapter 375 defining the clinical
experience required for this level of licensure.
Beginning January 1, 2020, an applicant for initial licensure shall must demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the board successful completion of a minimum of 12 hours of course work
in family or intimate partner violence, including course work in spousal or partner abuse
that addresses screening, referral and intervention strategies, including knowledge of
Page 1 - 132LR2309(01)

413 community resources, cultural factors, evidence-based risk assessment and same-gender
424 abuse dynamics. An applicant may fulfill this requirement through course work taken in
435 fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure or through separate course work
446 provided through contact hours, Internet hours or distance learning programs, as evidenced
457 by certification from an accredited educational institution. The board shall accept
468 certification from the accredited educational institution from which the applicant is a
479 graduate that verifies the applicant's satisfaction of this requirement within the applicant's
580 completed course curriculum. An applicant for initial licensure that is unable to
591 demonstrate completion of the requirement of 12 hours of course work at the time the initial
1502 application is submitted shall must demonstrate to the board that this requirement has been
1513 fulfilled upon the applicant's first application for license renewal.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 211, §2, is amended
to read:
2-A. Licensed master social worker. As a licensed master social worker, an applicant
must have received either a masters master's or doctoral degree in social work or social
welfare from an accredited educational institution, must have demonstrated to the
satisfaction of the board adherence to the ethics of the social work profession and must
have either successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board or have
qualified through an alternative pathway under section 7054-D. After meeting these
qualifications, the applicant must receive a "licensed master social worker" license. In
addition, any person wishing to practice social work in a clinical setting must receive a
"licensed master social worker, conditional" license.
This subsection takes effect July 1, 2005.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 112, Pt. A, §13,
is further amended to read:
A. The applicant must have received a bachelor's degree or higher in social work or
social welfare from an accredited educational institution; demonstrated to the
satisfaction of the board adherence to the ethics of the social worker profession; and
either successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board or have
qualified through an alternative pathway under section 7054-D; or
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2003, c. 429, §2 and
affected by §7, is further amended to read:
B. The applicant must have received a conditional license as a licensed social worker
in accordance with subsection 3‑B; completed the requirements for consultation and
contact hours in accordance with subsection 3‑C, paragraph B and subsection 3‑D; and
either successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board or have
qualified through an alternative pathway under section 7054-D.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §7054-D is enacted to read:
§7054-D. Alternative pathways to licensure
A person who has attempted and failed to complete the examination prescribed by the
board may qualify for licensure through one of the following alternative pathways.
1. Licensed social worker. An applicant for licensure as a licensed social worker
must:
Page 2 - 132LR2309(01)

A. Complete a jurisprudence examination as prescribed by the board;
B. Provide an expanded agreement to provide consultation form as prescribed by the
board documenting the intent to receive 144 hours of consultation concurrent with
4,800 hours of social work employment occurring within a period of not less than 3
years; and
C. Demonstrate competence in the 9 competencies established by the Council on
Social Work Education, or successor organization, through successful completion of a
bachelor's of social work graduate-level internship.
2. Licensed master social worker. An applicant for licensure as a licensed master
social worker must:
A. Complete a jurisprudence examination as prescribed by the board; and
B. Demonstrate competence in the 9 competencies established by the Council on
Social Work Education, or successor organization, through successful completion of a
master's of social work graduate-level internship.
3. Licensed master social worker, conditional clinical. An applicant for licensure
as a licensed master social worker, conditional clinical must:
A. Complete a jurisprudence examination as prescribed by the board;
B. Provide an expanded agreement to provide consultation form as prescribed by the
board documenting the intent to receive 144 hours of consultation concurrent with
4,800 hours of social work employment occurring within a period of not less than 3
years; and
C. Demonstrate competence in the 9 competencies established by the Council on
Social Work Education, or successor organization, through successful completion of a
master's of social work graduate-level internship.
4. Licensed clinical social worker. An applicant for licensure as a licensed clinical
social worker must:
A. Complete a jurisprudence examination as prescribed by the board;
B. Provide evidence, including documentation of clinical supervision using a form
approved by the board, of successful completion of a clinical social work experience
while licensed as a licensed master social worker, conditional clinical through 144
hours of consultation concurrent with 4,800 hours of social work employment
occurring within a period of not less than 3 years; and
C. Provide 3 letters of recommendation from licensed clinical social workers, with at
least 2 of the 3 letters being from licensed clinical social workers other than the
applicant's social work practice consultant.